Nebraska, session 109, LB1090.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1090 LB1090
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 32-629, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-629 For any petition prepared or filed pursuant to the Election
Act:
(1) Each petition signer shall be a registered voter and qualified
to sign a petition at the time of signing a petition, except that a
signer of a petition for President of the United States, a candidate
petition, a new political party petition, or an initiative or referendum
petition under sections 32-1401 to 32-1409 shall be a registered voter of
the State of Nebraska on or before the date on which the petition is
filed with the filing officer; and
(2) Only a person who (a) is at least eighteen years of age and (b)
has not been convicted of a felony or pleaded guilty to a felony unless
such person has received a pardon for any such felony shall qualify as a
valid circulator of a petition and may circulate petitions. Petition
circulators shall comply with section 32-630; and .
(3) Each petition circulator shall file a notarized affidavit with
the Secretary of State prior to circulating petitions stating:
(a) The petition circulator's name and date of birth;
(b) The petition circulator's mailing address;
(c) Whether the petition circulator has been convicted of a felony
or pleaded guilty to a felony; and
(d) Whether the petition circulator has received a pardon for any
felony such petition circulator has been convicted or pleaded guilty.
Sec. 2. Section 32-1546, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-1546 (1) Any person who is not, at the time of signing a
petition, a registered voter and qualified to sign the petition except as
provided in subdivision (1) of section 32-629 or who signs any name other
than his or her own to any petition shall be guilty of a Class I
misdemeanor.
-2-

LB1090 LB1090
2026 2026
(2) Any person who falsely swears to a circulator's affidavit on a
petition, who accepts money or other things of value for signing a
petition, or who offers money or other things of value in exchange for a
signature upon any petition shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(3) Any person who falsifies a letter submitted pursuant to section
32-632 or subsection (3) of section 32-1305 or who signs any name other
than his or her own to such letter shall be guilty of a Class I
misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who falsifies an affidavit filed pursuant to
subdivision (3) of section 32-629 shall be guilty of a Class III felony.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 4. Original sections 32-629 and 32-1546, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-3-